Hawaii statutes.
[§481F-4] Informational detail. The
following informational details shall be disclosed:

(1) The name of the artist and the artist's
participation in creating the print as follows:

(A) The name of the artist;

(B) Whether or not the image upon the master
exists in another medium and if so, state which medium;

(C) Name the person, persons or workshop who
created the image upon the master;

(D) Whether or not the artist approved the
master itself or the proofs therefrom;

(E) Whether or not the artist approved the
techniques utilized in the production of the print; and

(F) Whether or not the artist approved the
print.

(2) Signature. If the name of the artist appears on
the print, state whether the print was signed by the artist to signify approval
of the print. If the print was not signed by the artist, state the manner in
which the artist's name was placed on the print.

(3) The year in which the print was produced.

(4) A description of the medium or process such as
whether the print was produced by means of etching, engraving, woodcutting,
lithography, serigraphy, or other similar processes. If an established term,
in accordance with the usage of the trade, cannot be employed accurately to
describe the medium or process, a brief, clear description of the medium or
process shall be given.

(5) Whether the edition is being offered as limited
edition, and if so:

(A) The authorized number of signed or
numbered prints, or other, in the edition;

(B) The authorized number of unsigned or
unnumbered prints, or both, in the edition;

(C) The authorized number of proofs, if any,
in the edition;

(D) The authorized number of prints
designated "Hors de Commerce" or by words of similar import; and

(E) The total size of the edition.

(6) Whether or not the master has been destroyed,
effaced, altered, defaced, or canceled after producing the edition.

(7) If there were any prior prints of the same image
which were produced by a different process or media or utilized different
colors or color schemes, the total number of such prints and an explanation of
the difference in process, media, color, or color scheme.

(8) If there were any prior or later editions
produced from the same master, the series number or designation of the subject
edition and the total size of all other editions.

(9) Whether the edition is a posthumous edition or
restrike and, if so, whether the master was reworked. If the edition is a
restrike, state that restrike is a print multiple made from the master after
the edition is produced.

(10) The name of the printer or workshop, if any,
where the edition was produced. [L 1986, c 194, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next